Utah statutes.
31A-22-1404.   Rulemaking authority.

The commissioner may adopt rules that may permit or include:

(1)  the increase of benefits over time;

(2)  standards for full and fair disclosure of the manner, content, and required disclosures for the sale of long-term care insurance policies;

(3)  terms of renewability;

(4)  initial and subsequent conditions of eligibility;

(5)  nonduplication of coverage provisions;

(6)  coverage of dependents;

(7)  termination of coverage;

(8)  continuation or conversion;

(9)  probationary periods;

(10)  limitations, exceptions, and reductions of coverage;

(11)  preexisting conditions;

(12)  elimination and waiting periods;

(13)  requirements for replacement;

(14)  recurrent conditions;

(15)  definition of terms;

(16)  loss ratio requirements;

(17)  post claim underwriting;

(18)  waiver of premium;

(19)  inflation protection benefits; and

(20)  premium rate filing and review.

